District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.113

Interns.

The Board of Professional Engineering may also provide, by regulation, for the registration or licensure of an applicant as a land surveyor in training who meets such standards as the Board shall establish.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.113.